North Carolina, session 2025, SB223.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 115D-20(4)a. reads as rewritten:
"a. Subject to the approval of the State Board of Community Colleges,
local community colleges may collaborate with public school units
and nonpublic schools to offer courses through the following
programs:
1. Repealed by Session Laws 2022-71, s. 3.2, effective July 8,
2022.
2. Academic transition pathways for qualified junior and
sophomore, junior, and senior high school students that lead to
a career technical education certificate, diploma, or State or
industry-recognized credential and academic transition
pathways for qualified freshmen and sophomore high school
students that lead to a career technical education certificate or
diploma in (i) industrial and engineering technologies, (ii)
agriculture and natural resources, (iii) transportation
technology, (iv) construction, or (v) business technologies.
3. College transfer pathways requiring the successful completion
of 30 semester credit hours of transfer courses, including
English and mathematics, for the following students:
I. Qualified junior and senior high school students.
II. Qualified freshman and sophomore high school
students, if all of the following requirements are met:
A. The student is determined to be academically
gifted, have a demonstrated readiness for the
course material, and have the maturity to justify
admission to the community college by (i) the
community college president, (ii) the student's
high school principal or equivalent
administrator, and (iii) the academically gifted
coordinator, if one is employed by the high
school or local school administrative unit.
*S223-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
B. The student participates in academic advising
focused on the implications of being admitted
to college early with representatives from the
high school and the community college.
C. The student's parent or guardian has given
consent for the student to participate."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 school year.
Page 2 Senate Bill 223-First Edition